Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 10.1-1300.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Advisory Board”
means the State Advisory Board on Air Pollution.

“Air pollution”
means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more substances which are or may be harmful or injurious to human health, welfare or safety, to animal or plant life, or to property, or which unreasonably interfere with the enjoyment by the people of life or property.

“Board”
means the State Air Pollution Control Board.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
or

“Executive Director”

means the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Owner”
shall have no connotation other than that customarily assigned to the term “person,” but shall include bodies politic and corporate, associations, partnerships, personal representatives, trustees and committees, as well as individuals.

“Person”
means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, a governmental body, a municipal corporation, or any other legal entity.

“Special order”
means a special order issued under §

10.1-1309

.

“Wood heater”
means a wood stove, pellet stove, wood-fired hydronic heater, wood-burning forced-air furnace, or masonry wood heater, any of which is solely designed for heating a home or a business and with either (i) uncontrolled fine particulate matter with an aerodynamic diameter less than or equal to 2.5 micrometers (PM2.5) emissions of less than 10 tons per year or with a maximum heat input of less than 1,000,000 Btu/hr or (ii) uncontrolled fine particulate matter with an aerodynamic diameter less than or equal to 10 micrometers (PM10) emissions of less than 15 tons per year or with a maximum heat input of less than 1,000,000 Btu/hr.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.10; 1968, c. 311; 1970, c. 469; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 91; 1972, c. 781; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 891; 1990, c. 238; 1991, c. 702; 2004, c. 408; 2015, c. 471.

Cross references.

As to the creation of the Department of Environmental Quality, effective April 1, 1993, and the consolidation of the Department of Air Pollution Control into that department, see §

10.1-1183

.

As to the Attorney General’s limited authority to institute and conduct criminal prosecutions in the circuit courts of the Commonwealth, see § 2.2-511.

As to the environmental laboratory certification program of the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services, see § 2.2-1105.

As to the issuance of general permits under this section being exempt from the Administrative Process Act, see § 2.2-4006.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 408 substituted “Environmental Quality” for “Air Pollution Control” in the definitions of “Department” and “Director.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 471 added the definition for “Wood heater” at the end of the section.

Law Review.

For article addressing significant developments in Virginia law pertaining to air quality, water quality and solid and hazardous waste, between 1990 and 1992, see “Environmental Law,” 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 729 (1992).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-711.1. Commercial Credit Line Deed of Trust, Assignment of Leases and Security Agreement; No. 16-819. Hazardous Materials.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.

§ 10.1-1300.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this chapter the Board, the Department, or the Director is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board, the Department, or the Director may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 10.1-1301.
State Air Pollution Control Board; membership; terms; vacancies.

The State Air Pollution Control Board shall be composed of seven members appointed by the Governor for four-year terms. Vacancies other than by expiration of term shall be filled by the Governor by appointment for the unexpired term.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.11; 1988, c. 891; 2008, cc. 276, 557.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 4 provides: “That State Air Pollution Control Board members appointed before July 1, 2008, shall continue in office for the terms for which appointed. For the two additional members, one member shall be appointed for a term of four years and one member shall be appointed for a term of three years. Thereafter the successors of all members shall be appointed for four-year terms. Prior to July 1, 2010, the two additional members appointed pursuant hereto shall not vote on any action related to a permit for which the State Air Pollution Control Board has exercised its authority for direct consideration as of January 1, 2008.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and substituted “seven” for “five” near the middle of the first sentence.

§ 10.1-1302.
Qualifications of members of Board.

The members of the Board shall be citizens of the Commonwealth and shall be selected from the Commonwealth at large on the basis of merit without regard to political affiliation. Members shall, by their education, training, or experience, be knowledgeable of air quality control and regulation, and shall be fairly representative of conservation, public health, business, and agriculture. No person appointed to the Board shall be employed by persons subject to permits or enforcement orders of the Board or receive a significant portion of his income, whether directly or indirectly, from persons subject to permits or enforcement orders of the Board. Income from a vested retirement benefit shall not be considered income for purposes of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section relating to Board membership, the qualifications for Board membership shall not be more strict than those that are required by federal statute or regulations of the United States Environmental Protection Agency. The provisions of this section shall be in addition to the requirements of the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act (§ 2.2-3100 et seq.).

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.12; 1979, c. 117; 1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 675; 1994, c. 461; 2008, cc. 276, 557.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 675, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides that the 1992 act shall apply to appointments and reappointments made on and after July 1, 1993.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 4 provides: “That State Air Pollution Control Board members appointed before July 1, 2008, shall continue in office for the terms for which appointed. For the two additional members, one member shall be appointed for a term of four years and one member shall be appointed for a term of three years. Thereafter the successors of all members shall be appointed for four-year terms. Prior to July 1, 2010, the two additional members appointed pursuant hereto shall not vote on any action related to a permit for which the State Air Pollution Control Board has exercised its authority for direct consideration as of January 1, 2008.”

The 1992 amendment

substituted the present second sentence for the former which read: “No officer, employee or representative of any industry, county, city or town which may become subject to the regulations of the Board shall be appointed to the Board.” As to the applicability of this amendment, see the Editor’s note.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and substituted “Members shall, by their education, training, or experience, be knowledgeable of air quality control and regulation, and shall be fairly representative of conservation, public health, business, and agriculture. No person appointed to the Board shall be employed by persons subject to permits or enforcement orders of the Board or receive a significant portion of his income, whether directly or indirectly, from persons subject to permits or enforcement orders of the Board” for “At least a majority of members appointed to the Board shall represent the public interest and not derive any significant portion of their income from persons subject to permits or enforcement orders of the Board” in the second and third sentences; added the fourth sentence; and substituted “that are” for “which may be” in the fifth sentence.

§ 10.1-1303.
Chairman of the Board; Executive Director; cooperation of state agencies.

The Board shall elect its own chairman. The Governor shall appoint an Executive Director who shall serve as executive officer of the Board, but shall not serve as a member thereof. The Board may call upon any state department or agency for technical assistance. All departments and agencies of the Commonwealth shall, upon request, assist the Board in the performance of its duties.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.14; 1972, c. 781; 1984, c. 444; 1985, c. 397; 1988, c. 891; 1990, c. 238.

§ 10.1-1304.
Meetings of Board; quorum.

The Board shall meet at least four times a year. Special meetings may be held at any time or place to be determined by the Board upon the call of the chairman or upon written request of any two members. All members shall be notified of the time and place of any meeting at least five days in advance of the meeting. A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.15; 1988, c. 891; 2008, cc. 276, 557.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 4, provides: “That State Air Pollution Control Board members appointed before July 1, 2008, shall continue in office for the terms for which appointed. For the two additional members, one member shall be appointed for a term of four years and one member shall be appointed for a term of three years. Thereafter the successors of all members shall be appointed for four-year terms. Prior to July 1, 2010, the two additional members appointed pursuant hereto shall not vote on any action related to a permit for which the State Air Pollution Control Board has exercised its authority for direct consideration as of January 1, 2008.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and substituted “four times a year” for “once every three months” in the first sentence; and substituted “A majority of the” for “Three” at the beginning of the last sentence.

§ 10.1-1305.
Records of proceedings of Board.

The Board shall keep a complete and accurate record of the proceedings at all its meetings, a copy of which shall be kept on file in the office of the Director and available for public inspection.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.16; 1977, c. 31; 1988, cc. 26, 891.

§ 10.1-1306.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Inspections, investigations, etc.

The Board shall make, or cause to be made, such investigations and inspections and do such other things as are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, within the limits of the appropriations, study grants, funds, or personnel which are available for the purposes of this chapter, including the achievement and maintenance of such levels of air quality as will protect human health, welfare and safety and to the greatest degree practicable prevent injury to plant and animal life and property and which will foster the comfort and convenience of the people of the Commonwealth and their enjoyment of life and property and which will promote the economic and social development of the Commonwealth and facilitate enjoyment of its attractions.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.17; 1988, c. 891.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 substituted “Department” for “Board.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

State Air Pollution Control Board. —

State Air Pollution Control Board is legally authorized to regulate GHG emissions, including establishing a statewide cap on greenhouse gas emissions for all new and existing fossil fuel electric generating plants. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David J. Toscano Minority Leader, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-010, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 16 (5/12/17).

§ 10.1-1306.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Inspections, investigations, etc.

The Department shall make, or cause to be made, such investigations and inspections and do such other things as are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, within the limits of the appropriations, study grants, funds, or personnel which are available for the purposes of this chapter, including the achievement and maintenance of such levels of air quality as will protect human health, welfare and safety and to the greatest degree practicable prevent injury to plant and animal life and property and which will foster the comfort and convenience of the people of the Commonwealth and their enjoyment of life and property and which will promote the economic and social development of the Commonwealth and facilitate enjoyment of its attractions.

History.

1966, c. 497, § 10-17.17; 1988, c. 891; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1307.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Further powers and duties of Board.

The Board shall have the power to control and regulate its internal affairs; initiate and supervise research programs to determine the causes, effects, and hazards of air pollution; initiate and supervise statewide programs of air pollution control education; cooperate with and receive money from the federal government or any county or municipal government, and receive money from any other source, whether public or private; develop a comprehensive program for the study, abatement, and control of all sources of air pollution in the Commonwealth; and advise, consult, and cooperate with agencies of the United States and all agencies of the Commonwealth, political subdivisions, private industries, and any other affected groups in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

The Board may adopt by regulation emissions standards controlling the release into the atmosphere of air pollutants from motor vehicles, only as provided in §

10.1-1307.05

and Article 22 (§ 46.2-1176 et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 46.2.

After any regulation has been adopted by the Board pursuant to §

10.1-1308

, it may in its discretion grant local variances therefrom, if it finds after an investigation and hearing that local conditions warrant. If local variances are permitted, the Board shall issue an order to this effect. Such order shall be subject to revocation or amendment at any time if the Board after a hearing determines that the amendment or revocation is warranted. Variances and amendments to variances shall be adopted only after a public hearing has been conducted pursuant to the public advertisement of the subject, date, time, and place of the hearing at least 30 days prior to the scheduled hearing. The hearing shall be conducted to give the public an opportunity to comment on the variance.

After the Board has adopted the regulations provided for in §

10.1-1308

, it shall have the power to: (i) initiate and receive complaints as to air pollution; (ii) hold or cause to be held hearings and enter orders diminishing or abating the causes of air pollution and orders to enforce its regulations pursuant to §

10.1-1309

; and (iii) institute legal proceedings, including suits for injunctions for the enforcement of its orders, regulations, and the abatement and control of air pollution and for the enforcement of penalties.

The Board in making regulations and in approving variances, control programs, or permits, and the courts in granting injunctive relief under the provisions of this chapter, shall consider facts and circumstances relevant to the reasonableness of the activity involved and the regulations proposed to control it, including:

The character and degree of injury to, or interference with, safety, health, or the reasonable use of property which is caused or threatened to be caused;

The social and economic value of the activity involved;

The suitability of the activity to the area in which it is located; and

The scientific and economic practicality of reducing or eliminating the discharge resulting from such activity.

The Board may designate one of its members, the Director, or a staff assistant to conduct the hearings provided for in this chapter. A record of the hearing shall be made and furnished to the Board for its use in arriving at its decision.

The Board shall not:

Adopt any regulation limiting emissions from wood heaters; or

Enforce against a manufacturer, distributor, or consumer any federal regulation limiting emissions from wood heaters adopted after May 1, 2014.

The Board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly on or before October 1 of each year on matters relating to the Commonwealth’s air pollution control policies and on the status of the Commonwealth’s air quality.

History.

1966, c. 497, §§ 10-17.16, 10-17.18; 1968, c. 311; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 8; 1970, c. 469; 1972, c. 781; 1973, c. 251; 1977, c. 31; 1980, c. 469; 1984, c. 734; 1988, cc. 26, 891; 1990, c. 231; 2004, c. 650; 2015, c. 471; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 650 substituted “30” for “thirty” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection C; and deleted the last sentence in subsection G, which read: “The annual report shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of § 2.2-1127.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 471 added subsection G and redesignated former subsection G as subsection H.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 263, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “§

10.1-1307.05

and” in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in subsection A, divided the former only sentence into two sentences and added “The Department shall have the power to” in the current second sentence at the beginning; in subsection C, substituted “the Department” for “it” and “the Board” throughout, deleted “in its discretion” preceding “grant,” and inserted “except that no local variances shall be granted from regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to §

10.1-1308

related to the requirements of subsection E of §

10.1-1308

or Article 4 (§

10.1-1329

et seq.)”; in subsection D, substituted “the Department” for “it,” substituted “the Board’s” for “its” in clause (ii), and deleted “its” preceding “orders” in clause (iii); and substituted “The Board in making regulations; the Department in approving variances, control programs, or permits; and” for “The Board in making regulations and in approving variances, control programs, or permits, and” in subsection E; added “except that consideration of this factor shall be satisfied if the local governing body of a locality in which a facility or activity is proposed has resolved that the location and operation of the proposed facility or activity is suitable to the area in which it is located” in subdivision E 3 at the end; rewrote subsection F, which read: “The Board may designate one of its members, the Director, or a staff assistant to conduct the hearings provided for in this chapter. A record of the hearing shall be made and furnished to the Board for its use in arriving at its decision”; substituted “Department” for “Board” in subsection H; added subsection I; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-1307.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Further powers and duties of Board and Department.

The Board shall have the power to control and regulate its internal affairs. The Department shall have the power to initiate and supervise research programs to determine the causes, effects, and hazards of air pollution; initiate and supervise statewide programs of air pollution control education; cooperate with and receive money from the federal government or any county or municipal government, and receive money from any other source, whether public or private; develop a comprehensive program for the study, abatement, and control of all sources of air pollution in the Commonwealth; and advise, consult, and cooperate with agencies of the United States and all agencies of the Commonwealth, political subdivisions, private industries, and any other affected groups in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

The Board may adopt by regulation emissions standards controlling the release into the atmosphere of air pollutants from motor vehicles, only as provided in §

10.1-1307.05

and Article 22 (§ 46.2-1176 et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 46.2.

After any regulation has been adopted by the Board pursuant to §

10.1-1308

, the Department may grant local variances therefrom, if it finds after an investigation and hearing that local conditions warrant; except that no local variances shall be granted from regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to §

10.1-1308

related to the requirements of subsection E of §

10.1-1308

or Article 4 (§

10.1-1329

et seq.). If local variances are permitted, the Department shall issue an order to this effect. Such order shall be subject to revocation or amendment at any time if the Department, after a hearing, determines that the amendment or revocation is warranted. Variances and amendments to variances shall be adopted only after a public hearing has been conducted pursuant to the public advertisement of the subject, date, time, and place of the hearing at least 30 days prior to the scheduled hearing. The hearing shall be conducted to give the public an opportunity to comment on the variance.

After the Board has adopted the regulations provided for in §

10.1-1308

, the Department shall have the power to (i) initiate and receive complaints as to air pollution; (ii) hold or cause to be held hearings and enter orders diminishing or abating the causes of air pollution and orders to enforce the Board’s regulations pursuant to §

10.1-1309

; and (iii) institute legal proceedings, including suits for injunctions for the enforcement of orders, regulations, and the abatement and control of air pollution and for the enforcement of penalties.

The Board in making regulations; the Department in approving variances, control programs, or permits; and the courts in granting injunctive relief under the provisions of this chapter, shall consider facts and circumstances relevant to the reasonableness of the activity involved and the regulations proposed to control it, including:

The character and degree of injury to, or interference with, safety, health, or the reasonable use of property which is caused or threatened to be caused;

The social and economic value of the activity involved;

The suitability of the activity to the area in which it is located, except that consideration of this factor shall be satisfied if the local governing body of a locality in which a facility or activity is proposed has resolved that the location and operation of the proposed facility or activity is suitable to the area in which it is located; and

The scientific and economic practicality of reducing or eliminating the discharge resulting from such activity.

The Department shall conduct the hearings provided for in this chapter.

The Board shall not:

Adopt any regulation limiting emissions from wood heaters; or

Enforce against a manufacturer, distributor, or consumer any federal regulation limiting emissions from wood heaters adopted after May 1, 2014.

The Department shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly on or before October 1 of each year on matters relating to the Commonwealth’s air pollution control policies and on the status of the Commonwealth’s air quality.

In granting a permit pursuant to this section, the Department shall provide in writing a clear and concise statement of the legal basis, scientific rationale, and justification for the decision reached. When the decision of the Department is to deny a permit, pursuant to this section, the Department shall, in consultation with legal counsel, provide a clear and concise statement explaining the reason for the denial, the scientific justification for the same, and how the Department’s decision is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Copies of the decision, certified by the Director, shall be mailed by certified mail to the permittee or applicant.

History.

1966, c. 497, §§ 10-17.16, 10-17.18; 1968, c. 311; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 8; 1970, c. 469; 1972, c. 781; 1973, c. 251; 1977, c. 31; 1980, c. 469; 1984, c. 734; 1988, cc. 26, 891; 1990, c. 231; 2004, c. 650; 2015, c. 471; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 263; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1307.01.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Further duties of Board; localities particularly affected.

Before promulgating a regulation under consideration, granting a variance to an existing regulation, or issuing a permit for the construction of a new major source or for a major modification to an existing source, if the Board finds that there is a locality particularly affected by the regulation, variance, or permit, the Board shall:

Publish, or require the applicant to publish, a notice in a local paper of general circulation in each locality affected at least 30 days prior to the close of any public comment period. Such notice shall contain a statement of the estimated local impact of the proposed action, which at a minimum shall provide information regarding specific pollutants and the total quantity of each that may be emitted and shall list the type and quantity of any fuels to be used.

Mail the notice to the chief elected official and chief administrative officer of and the planning district commission for such locality.Written comments shall be accepted by the Board for at least 15 days after any hearing on the regulation, variance, or permit, unless the Board votes to shorten the period.

Before granting any variance to an existing regulation or issuing any permit for (i) a new fossil fuel-fired generating facility with a capacity of 500 megawatts or more, (ii) a major modification to an existing source that is a fossil fuel-fired generating facility with a capacity of 500 megawatts or more, (iii) a new fossil fuel-fired compressor station facility used to transport natural gas, or (iv) a major modification to an existing source that is a fossil fuel-fired compressor station facility used to transport natural gas, if the Board finds that there is a locality particularly affected by such variance or permit, the Board shall:

Require the applicant to publish a notice in at least one local paper of general circulation in any locality particularly affected at least 60 days prior to the close of any public comment period. Such notice shall (i) contain a statement of the estimated local impact of the proposed action; (ii) provide information regarding specific pollutants and the total quantity of each that may be emitted; (iii) list the type, quantity, and source of any fuel to be used; (iv) advise the public how to request Board consideration or a public hearing; and (v) advise the public where to obtain information regarding the proposed action. The Department shall post such notice on the Department website and on a Department social media account.

Require the applicant to mail the notice to (i) the chief elected official of, chief administrative officer of, and planning district commission for each locality particularly affected; (ii) every public library and public school located within five miles of such facility; and (iii) the owner of each parcel of real property that is depicted as adjacent to the facility on the current real estate tax assessment maps of the locality.Written comments shall be accepted by the Board for at least 30 days after any hearing on such variance or permit, unless the Board votes to shorten the period.

For the purposes of this section, the term “locality particularly affected” means any locality that bears any identified disproportionate material air quality impact that would not be experienced by other localities.

History.

1993, c. 944; 1997, c. 612; 2020, c. 1110.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 944, cl. 2 provides that the requirements of the 1993 act affecting regulatory actions shall apply only to regulatory actions for which a notice of intended regulatory action has been filed with the Registrar of Regulations on or after July 1, 1993.

The 1997 amendment,

in the introductory paragraph, substituted “consideration, granting” for “consideration or granting” and substituted “any permit for the construction of a new major source or for a major modification to an existing source” for “any major permit.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1110, rewrote the section.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in subsection A in the introductory language, inserted “The Board,” “or the Department, before,” and “respectively”; substituted “it is found” for “the Board finds”; and deleted “the Board” preceding “shall”; in subsection A in the last paragraph, deleted “variance, or permit” following “regulation” and added the second sentence; in subsection B in the introductory language, added “If the Department finds” at the beginning; deleted “if the Board finds” preceding “that there is a locality”; and substituted “the Department shall” for “the Board shall”; in subdivision B 1 in clause (iv), substituted “as to the date and location of” for “how to request Board consideration or”; in subsection B in the last paragraph, substituted “Department” for “Board” and “Director” for “Board votes”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-1307.01.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Further duties of Board and Department; localities particularly affected.

The Board, before promulgating a regulation under consideration, or the Department, before granting a variance to an existing regulation, or issuing a permit for the construction of a new major source or for a major modification to an existing source, if it is found that there is a locality particularly affected by the regulation, variance, or permit, shall, respectively:

Publish, or require the applicant to publish, a notice in a local paper of general circulation in each locality affected at least 30 days prior to the close of any public comment period. Such notice shall contain a statement of the estimated local impact of the proposed action, which at a minimum shall provide information regarding specific pollutants and the total quantity of each that may be emitted and shall list the type and quantity of any fuels to be used.

Mail the notice to the chief elected official and chief administrative officer of and the planning district commission for such locality.

Written comments shall be accepted by the Board for at least 15 days after any hearing on the regulation unless the Board votes to shorten the period. Written comments shall be accepted by the Department for at least 15 days after any hearing on the variance or permit.

If the Department finds, before granting any variance to an existing regulation or issuing any permit for (i) a new fossil fuel-fired generating facility with a capacity of 500 megawatts or more, (ii) a major modification to an existing source that is a fossil fuel-fired generating facility with a capacity of 500 megawatts or more, (iii) a new fossil fuel-fired compressor station facility used to transport natural gas, or (iv) a major modification to an existing source that is a fossil fuel-fired compressor station facility used to transport natural gas, that there is a locality particularly affected by such variance or permit, the Department shall:

Require the applicant to publish a notice in at least one local paper of general circulation in any locality particularly affected at least 60 days prior to the close of any public comment period. Such notice shall (i) contain a statement of the estimated local impact of the proposed action; (ii) provide information regarding specific pollutants and the total quantity of each that may be emitted; (iii) list the type, quantity, and source of any fuel to be used; (iv) advise the public as to the date and location of a public hearing; and (v) advise the public where to obtain information regarding the proposed action. The Department shall post such notice on the Department website and on a Department social media account.

Require the applicant to mail the notice to (i) the chief elected official of, chief administrative officer of, and planning district commission for each locality particularly affected; (ii) every public library and public school located within five miles of such facility; and (iii) the owner of each parcel of real property that is depicted as adjacent to the facility on the current real estate tax assessment maps of the locality.

Written comments shall be accepted by the Department for at least 30 days after any hearing on such variance or permit, unless the Director elects to shorten the period.

For the purposes of this section, the term “locality particularly affected” means any locality that bears any identified disproportionate material air quality impact that would not be experienced by other localities.

History.

1993, c. 944; 1997, c. 612; 2020, c. 1110; 2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1307.02.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Permit for generation of electricity during ISO-declared emergency.

As used in this section:“Emergency generation source” means a stationary internal combustion engine that operates according to the procedures in the ISO’s emergency operations manual during an ISO-declared emergency.“ISO-declared emergency” means a condition that exists when the independent system operator, as defined in § 56-576, notifies electric utilities that an emergency exists or may occur and that complies with the definition of “emergency” adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection B.“Retail customer” has the same meaning ascribed thereto in § 56-576.

The Board shall adopt a general permit or permits for the use of back-up generation to authorize the construction, installation, reconstruction, modification, and operation of emergency generation sources during ISO-declared emergencies. Such general permit or permits shall include a definition of “emergency” that is compatible with the ISO’s emergency operations manual. After adoption of such general permit or permits, any amendments to the Board’s regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

2009, cc. 752, 855.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 752 and 855, cl. 2 provides: “§ 1. That the State Corporation Commission shall conduct a formal public proceeding that will include an evidentiary hearing for the purpose of determining achievable, cost-effective energy conservation and demand response targets that can realistically be accomplished in the Commonwealth through demand-side management portfolios administered by each generating electric utility in the Commonwealth. As used in this act, ‘generating electric utility’ means a public service corporation that serves electric load at retail, has rates regulated by the State Corporation Commission, and that, as of January 1, 2009, directly owns and operates electric generation facilities in excess of six megawatts, other than diesel generators used for voltage control. The determination of what consumption and peak load reductions can be achieved cost-effectively shall consider standard industry-recognized tests. The Commission shall determine which test should be given greatest weight when preparing a cost-benefit analysis of a demand-side management program, taking into consideration the public interest and the potential impact on economic development in the Commonwealth.

“§ 2. That the State Corporation Commission shall report its findings to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before November 15, 2009. Such report shall (i) indicate the range of consumption and peak load reductions that are potentially achievable by each generating electric utility, the range of costs that consumers would pay to achieve those reductions, and the range of financial benefits or savings that could be realized if the targets were met over a 15-year period; and (ii) determine a just and reasonable ratemaking methodology to be employed to quantify the cost responsibility of each customer class to pay for generating electric utility-administered demand-side management programs. This evaluation shall include an examination of the class cost responsibility methods used in other jurisdictions, including, but not limited to, the allocation of costs based on projected class benefits and the allocation of costs based on program participation. The analysis shall also examine other jurisdictions that permit certain nonresidential customers or classes of customers to either be exempt from paying for the utility demand-side management programs or to opt out of participating in or paying for the utility demand-side management programs, and determine if it would be in the public interest for the Commonwealth to have a similar policy.

“§ 3. That the State Corporation Commission, for the service area of a generating electric utility that has elected to meet its capacity obligations of a regional transmission entity through a fixed capacity resource requirement as an alternative to other capacity mechanisms, shall approve any demand response program proposed to be offered to retail customers by the generating electric utility or any other qualified nonutility provider if, following notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the State Corporation Commission finds (i) any nonutility provider to be qualified, (ii) the program to be effective, reliable, and verifiable as a capacity resource, and (iii) such program to be in the public interest. A State Corporation Commission order issued pursuant to this section shall not affect any contract between a retail customer and a curtailment service provider executed prior to July 1, 2009.

“§ 4. That the State Air Pollution Control Board, in consultation with the State Corporation Commission and the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy, shall adopt an air general permit or permits for the construction, installation, and operation of distillate oil, natural gas, liquid propane gas, and bio-diesel fired electric generating facilities that participate in a voluntary demand response program (i.e. load curtailment, demand response, peak shaving or like program) and that qualify as non-major facilities under the Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990. Participation in PJM Interconnection LLC’s Emergency Load Response Program, as defined in PJM Interconnection LLC’s Manual 13 Emergency Operations, shall not be considered as participating in a voluntary load reduction program. The air general permit shall have requirements ensuring air quality is protected, including appropriate control technologies.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 in subsection B, substituted “regulation” for “or permits” three times.